browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4350 Y 1
SFX 4350 l ndai l
SFX 4678 Y 1
SFX 4678 c gas c
SFX 1081 Y 1
SFX 1081 a entass a
SFX 3837 Y 1
SFX 3837 n tschava n
SFX 783 Y 1
SFX 783 a idas a
SFX 3834 Y 1
SFX 3834 r tschava r
SFX 2277 Y 1
SFX 2277 a fitgads a
SFX 1686 Y 1
SFX 1686 a isais a
SFX 2343 Y 1
SFX 2343 t vra t
SFX 2276 Y 1
SFX 2276 c fitgads c
SFX 1086 Y 1
SFX 1086 a entai a
SFX 4689 Y 1
SFX 4689 d ffa d
SFX 2101 Y 1
SFX 2101 a seschas a
SFX 3142 Y 1
SFX 3142 l ns l
SFX 2865 Y 1
SFX 2865 t zià t
SFX 272 Y 1
SFX 272 c seschas c
SFX 4871 Y 1
SFX 4871 a clond a
SFX 4600 Y 1
SFX 4600 a icra a
SFX 2854 Y 1
SFX 2854 t ziond t
SFX 4884 Y 1
SFX 4884 a clain a
SFX 4339 Y 1
SFX 4339 a ng a
SFX 1443 Y 1
SFX 1443 c tgassas c
SFX 4278 Y 1
SFX 4278 a ometer a
SFX 3044 Y 1
SFX 3044 l stia l
SFX 2872 Y 1
SFX 2872 t ziain t
SFX 2463 Y 1
SFX 2463 n seschas n
SFX 4558 Y 1
SFX 4558 a ignas a
SFX 3096 Y 1
SFX 3096 n rmeschia n
SFX 3617 Y 1
SFX 3617 t ziunava t
SFX 1460 Y 1
SFX 1460 a ss a
SFX 3087 Y 1
SFX 3087 l rts l
SFX 3064 Y 1
SFX 3064 d ss d
SFX 2450 Y 1
SFX 2450 r ssai r
SFX 4146 Y 1
SFX 4146 n rts n
SFX 2856 Y 1
SFX 2856 t zieschia t
SFX 2271 Y 1
SFX 2271 a fitgais a
SFX 2270 Y 1
SFX 2270 c fitgais c
SFX 1828 Y 1
SFX 1828 i ss i
SFX 2677 Y 1
SFX 2677 c gnavas c
SFX 1459 Y 1
SFX 1459 l ss l
SFX 1085 Y 1
SFX 1085 a entain a
SFX 358 Y 1
SFX 358 a ist a
SFX 1825 Y 1
SFX 1825 n ss n
SFX 2513 Y 1
SFX 2513 l rin l
SFX 2434 Y 1
SFX 2434 p ss p
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 r ss r
SFX 304 Y 1
SFX 304 a ez a
SFX 1665 Y 1
SFX 1665 i jan i
SFX 2604 Y 1
SFX 2604 a ista a
SFX 2453 Y 1
SFX 2453 r ssadas r
SFX 1683 Y 1
SFX 1683 a isassas a
SFX 1076 Y 1
SFX 1076 a entavas a
SFX 1876 Y 1
SFX 1876 a iseschias a
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 i nta i
SFX 2870 Y 1
SFX 2870 t ziai t
SFX 1685 Y 1
SFX 1685 a isass a
SFX 1826 Y 1
SFX 1826 d ssiun d
SFX 704 Y 1
SFX 704 l nta l
SFX 4683 Y 1
SFX 4683 d fla d
SFX 245 Y 1
SFX 245 a in a
SFX 1090 Y 1
SFX 1090 a en a
SFX 1724 Y 1
SFX 1724 a her a
SFX 305 Y 1
SFX 305 a essan a
SFX 4567 Y 1
SFX 4567 a ifitgeschan a
SFX 3822 Y 1
SFX 3822 r ts r
SFX 4000 Y 1
SFX 4000 n ssiun n
SFX 3266 Y 1
SFX 3266 g in g
SFX 3944 Y 1
SFX 3944 a tg a
SFX 4186 Y 1
SFX 4186 a rà a
SFX 3890 Y 1
SFX 3890 i tiva i
SFX 2436 Y 1
SFX 2436 r ssiun r
SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 a eschias a
SFX 2917 Y 1
SFX 2917 a ulavas a
SFX 1885 Y 1
SFX 1885 a ineschia a
SFX 2702 Y 1
SFX 2702 d eschias d
SFX 2424 Y 1
SFX 2424 r stga r
SFX 2201 Y 1
SFX 2201 a issas a
SFX 182 Y 1
SFX 182 a us a
SFX 3655 Y 1
SFX 3655 c us c
SFX 458 Y 1
SFX 458 r tiva r
SFX 3932 Y 1
SFX 3932 l tg l
SFX 4185 Y 1
SFX 4185 l rà l
SFX 1816 Y 1
SFX 1816 n tg n
SFX 920 Y 1
SFX 920 a egiar a
SFX 1784 Y 1
SFX 1784 i us i
SFX 1597 Y 1
SFX 1597 r tg r
SFX 4568 Y 1
SFX 4568 a ifitgescha a
SFX 3608 Y 1
SFX 3608 t zius t
SFX 937 Y 1
SFX 937 s tg s
SFX 90 Y 1
SFX 90 a eschia a
SFX 2617 Y 1
SFX 2617 a inias a
SFX 2894 Y 1
SFX 2894 o us o
SFX 1536 Y 1
SFX 1536 a istica a
SFX 2294 Y 1
SFX 2294 d eschia d
SFX 2662 Y 1
SFX 2662 a idan a
SFX 4550 Y 1
SFX 4550 a iliar a
SFX 3654 Y 1
SFX 3654 s us s
SFX 1687 Y 1
SFX 1687 a isain a
SFX 2102 Y 1
SFX 2102 a seschan a
SFX 273 Y 1
SFX 273 c seschan c
SFX 3007 Y 1
SFX 3007 a tgas a
SFX 3229 Y 1
SFX 3229 i lava i
SFX 4903 Y 1
SFX 4903 a cha a
SFX 4663 Y 1
SFX 4663 a glia a
SFX 3987 Y 1
SFX 3987 n stica n
SFX 3646 Y 1
SFX 3646 t veglia t
SFX 2781 Y 1
SFX 2781 a cla a
SFX 1444 Y 1
SFX 1444 c tgassan c
SFX 1850 Y 1
SFX 1850 l ntar l
SFX 4321 Y 1
SFX 4321 m ntar m
SFX 2863 Y 1
SFX 2863 t ziavas t
SFX 656 Y 1
SFX 656 i nza i
SFX 2857 Y 1
SFX 2857 t zieschias t
SFX 2464 Y 1
SFX 2464 n seschan n
SFX 2143 Y 1
SFX 2143 l nza l
SFX 4309 Y 1
SFX 4309 m nza m
SFX 3977 Y 1
SFX 3977 d sur d
SFX 2136 Y 1
SFX 2136 a on a
SFX 4747 Y 1
SFX 4747 a ereschia a
SFX 2247 Y 1
SFX 2247 a fitgond a
SFX 1916 Y 1
SFX 1916 c gn c
SFX 4653 Y 1
SFX 4653 d gn d
SFX 3939 Y 1
SFX 3939 r tgas r
SFX 2246 Y 1
SFX 2246 c fitgond c
SFX 1598 Y 1
SFX 1598 s tgas s
SFX 4652 Y 1
SFX 4652 f gn f
SFX 4274 Y 1
SFX 4274 i on i
SFX 3845 Y 1
SFX 3845 n tschar n
SFX 2678 Y 1
SFX 2678 c gnavan c
SFX 979 Y 1
SFX 979 a egiads a
SFX 4913 Y 1
SFX 4913 a bladad a
SFX 4834 Y 1
SFX 4834 c di c
SFX 3335 Y 1
SFX 3335 c gns c
SFX 2965 Y 1
SFX 2965 r tschar r
SFX 1386 Y 1
SFX 1386 a iads a
SFX 2908 Y 1
SFX 2908 a uleschias a
SFX 3970 Y 1
SFX 3970 a tas a
SFX 1451 Y 1
SFX 1451 c tgada c
SFX 4158 Y 1
SFX 4158 n rmassas n
SFX 4201 Y 1
SFX 4201 n ppar n
SFX 3320 Y 1
SFX 3320 a idà a
SFX 2478 Y 1
SFX 2478 a sch a
SFX 4109 Y 1
SFX 4109 g schavas g
SFX 969 Y 1
SFX 969 a egiond a
SFX 4107 Y 1
SFX 4107 d sch d
SFX 4268 Y 1
SFX 4268 a onisaziun a
SFX 2337 Y 1
SFX 2337 t ziunal t
SFX 1684 Y 1
SFX 1684 a isassan a
SFX 2930 Y 1
SFX 2930 a ulà a
SFX 857 Y 1
SFX 857 g sch g
SFX 4681 Y 1
SFX 4681 f gada f
SFX 4108 Y 1
SFX 4108 n schavas n
SFX 1077 Y 1
SFX 1077 a entavan a
SFX 2257 Y 1
SFX 2257 a fitgavas a
SFX 4338 Y 1
SFX 4338 m nic m
SFX 2741 Y 1
SFX 2741 a eglia a
SFX 2256 Y 1
SFX 2256 c fitgavas c
SFX 1877 Y 1
SFX 1877 a iseschian a
SFX 459 Y 1
SFX 459 l sch l
SFX 993 Y 1
SFX 993 n sch n
SFX 4750 Y 1
SFX 4750 a erescha a
SFX 4078 Y 1
SFX 4078 p sch p
SFX 3969 Y 1
SFX 3969 s tas s
SFX 2503 Y 1
SFX 2503 n rtar n
SFX 137 Y 1
SFX 137 a das a
SFX 4662 Y 1
SFX 4662 a glià a
SFX 4167 Y 1
SFX 4167 n rmada n
SFX 3120 Y 1
SFX 3120 a otta a
SFX 275 Y 1
SFX 275 r sch r
SFX 4583 Y 1
SFX 4583 a ifitgada a
SFX 2125 Y 1
SFX 2125 a sada a
SFX 260 Y 1
SFX 260 c sada c
SFX 976 Y 1
SFX 976 a egiais a
SFX 1852 Y 1
SFX 1852 l ntada l
SFX 4118 Y 1
SFX 4118 d schas d
SFX 2240 Y 1
SFX 2240 c gnada c
SFX 1878 Y 1
SFX 1878 a iseschia a
SFX 1282 Y 1
SFX 1282 a iais a
SFX 2475 Y 1
SFX 2475 g schas g
SFX 1201 Y 1
SFX 1201 a ziun a
SFX 1882 Y 1
SFX 1882 a isesch a
SFX 3833 Y 1
SFX 3833 n tschavas n
SFX 2104 Y 1
SFX 2104 a sesch a
SFX 460 Y 1
SFX 460 l schas l
SFX 112 Y 1
SFX 112 a eschian a
SFX 3832 Y 1
SFX 3832 r tschavas r
SFX 2918 Y 1
SFX 2918 a ulavan a
SFX 2124 Y 1
SFX 2124 n sada n
SFX 271 Y 1
SFX 271 c sesch c
SFX 1246 Y 1
SFX 1246 n schas n
SFX 2703 Y 1
SFX 2703 d eschian d
SFX 2202 Y 1
SFX 2202 a issan a
SFX 881 Y 1
SFX 881 i ziun i
SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 a un a
SFX 2222 Y 1
SFX 2222 a ineschias a
SFX 2088 Y 1
SFX 2088 a stic a
SFX 307 Y 1
SFX 307 r schas r
SFX 1200 Y 1
SFX 1200 l ziun l
SFX 2087 Y 1
SFX 2087 c stic c
SFX 2510 Y 1
SFX 2510 n rtadas n
SFX 2898 Y 1
SFX 2898 i un i
SFX 2459 Y 1
SFX 2459 n sesch n
SFX 1889 Y 1
SFX 1889 a inesch a
SFX 46 Y 1
SFX 46 r ziun r
SFX 2927 Y 1
SFX 2927 a ulads a
SFX 1165 Y 1
SFX 1165 a inads a
SFX 178 Y 1
SFX 178 t ziun t
SFX 3693 Y 1
SFX 3693 l un l
SFX 2448 Y 1
SFX 2448 l ssa l
SFX 1674 Y 1
SFX 1674 a ivas a
SFX 1987 Y 1
SFX 1987 v ziun v
SFX 4009 Y 1
SFX 4009 n ssa n
SFX 2618 Y 1
SFX 2618 a inian a
SFX 1418 Y 1
SFX 1418 n un n
SFX 2423 Y 1
SFX 2423 n stic n
SFX 2666 Y 1
SFX 2666 a idai a
SFX 1115 Y 1
SFX 1115 r ssa r
SFX 4034 Y 1
SFX 4034 r sit r
SFX 2913 Y 1
SFX 2913 a ulescha a
SFX 1789 Y 1
SFX 1789 s un s
SFX 1154 Y 1
SFX 1154 a inond a
SFX 1435 Y 1
SFX 1435 c tgesch c
SFX 1417 Y 1
SFX 1417 t un t
SFX 598 Y 1
SFX 598 a inas a
SFX 1337 Y 1
SFX 1337 r tivas r
SFX 2267 Y 1
SFX 2267 a fitgass a
SFX 2926 Y 1
SFX 2926 a ulai a
SFX 2262 Y 1
SFX 2262 c fitgass c
SFX 4654 Y 1
SFX 4654 a gnar a
SFX 2684 Y 1
SFX 2684 c gnar c
SFX 1908 Y 1
SFX 1908 a iesch a
SFX 3056 Y 1
SFX 3056 c sta c
SFX 3055 Y 1
SFX 3055 d sta d
SFX 2864 Y 1
SFX 2864 t ziavan t
SFX 2858 Y 1
SFX 2858 t zieschian t
SFX 2034 Y 1
SFX 2034 a unas a
SFX 1596 Y 1
SFX 1596 s tgs s
SFX 4156 Y 1
SFX 4156 n rmava n
SFX 2924 Y 1
SFX 2924 a ulais a
SFX 1162 Y 1
SFX 1162 a inais a
SFX 4572 Y 1
SFX 4572 a ifitgava a
SFX 3092 Y 1
SFX 3092 l rn l
SFX 1605 Y 1
SFX 1605 l sta l
SFX 288 Y 1
SFX 288 a end a
SFX 4150 Y 1
SFX 4150 n rn n
SFX 975 Y 1
SFX 975 a egiass a
SFX 1344 Y 1
SFX 1344 n sta n
SFX 3997 Y 1
SFX 3997 p sta p
SFX 2679 Y 1
SFX 2679 c gnava c
SFX 3705 Y 1
SFX 3705 i unas i
