browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.dic
Adia/2478
ballin/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,2423,3987
communa/107,200,358,825,983,1098,1274,1371,1536,1676,2604
d'er/1,5,13,16,150,1584,2424,2997,3966,4001,4034
diagnostic/5,83,221,1431,1439,1440,1443,1444,1445,1446,1447,1449,1450,1451,1452
faud/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,68,70,265,516,721,1771,3064
Filippi/301,1784
flur/1,3,5,9,10,15,20,35,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,71,72,73,74,86,88,98,102,135,145,147,148,149,151,152,450,706,721,1335,2221,2436
forma/77,79,156,467,555,779,780,865,1049,1486,2376,2572,2906,2908,2909,2910,2911,2912,2913,2914,2916,2917,2918,2919,2920,2921,2922,2924,2925,2926,2927,2928,2929,2930
frasa/1,3007
fris/5,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,144,192,672,937,986,1237,1596,2318,2594,3940
gloria/9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,89,90,91,92,93,111,112,182,633,1847,2247,2255,2257,2259,2261,2264,2266,2267,2269,2271,2273,2275,2277,2279,2281,2283,2692,2693,2694,2695,2696,2697,2699
idra/75,172,321,1132,1638,2138,2544,4278
inditga/9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,89,90,91,92,93,111,112
liva/4186
marc/1,3,4,5,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,68,70,77,79,80,141,144,156,199,210,218,222,223,227,228,229,230,231,232,233,238,239,240,241,253,262,298,302,353,362,391,408,604,661,662,663,691,692,741,866,956,1449,1452,1859,1869,2736,3655,4457,4834
Maya/1090
m'explitgar/20
mitigiai/1,2,237,823,881,2090,2361,2362,2447
negai/1,2,881,2090,2361,2362,2447,3890
novella/1536
paina/3944
plastic/64,80,748,2246,2256,2258,2260,2262,2263,2265,2268,2270,2272,2274,2276,2278,2280,2282
plazza/1,2,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,53,54,62,63,79,84,87,89,90,91,92,93,186,245,251
potent/177,2338,2854,2865,3285,3630,3631
pult/2343
pund/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,2294,2295,2702,2703,2704,2705,2706,4616
rapin/5,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,55,58,59,70,98,141,153,1825,3047
raziunal/5,64,88,95,106,109,110,113,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,127,128,129,130,131,134,197,1459,1646,2089,2091,2363,2887,2888
reflui/1,2,11,12,13,14,16,17,18,19,22,24,61,1828
s'affa/2,11,327,675,776,816,817,819,2289,2290,3320,4549,4550
scad/3,4,5,6,7,8,10,30,31,32,57,71,72,73,74,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,136,313,600,1561,2615,4461,4689
schnorra/1,2,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,53,62,63,873,919,920,921,922,969,970,971,972,973,974,975,976,977,978,979,980,981
scursai/3229
servitur/3822
sfendaglia/182
sgut/60,82,138,140,142,150,157,158,159,160,161,163,164,166,167,168,169,170,171,173,175,572,882,2079,2866,3608
s'inscriva/2,45,63,288,305,312
spart/3,4,5,6,7,8,9,10,15,30,31,32,57,71,72,73,74,85,86,94,97,100,101,103,104,135,145,147,148,149,151,152,706,1417,2840,2897,2900,2901,3646
spir/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,68,81,146,199,252,780,1597,1759,2333,3285
spunda/1,9,10,15,263,287,288,293,305,311,312,536,783,912,1050,1901,2599
stil/1,102,106,109,110,113,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,127,128,129,130,131,183,197,422,1477,2363,3192,3932,4185,4355,4701,4703,4705
stracoi/1,2,5,57,1490,1491,1665
succed/3,4,5,6,7,8,9,10,15,57,71,72,73,74,86,135,145,147,148,149,152,1244,1826,3057,3064,3977
svid/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,176,2294,2295,2702,2703,2704,2705,2706,3055
telematica/1724
t'exprima/1,45,62,1674,2201
tgul/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,194,3932
trid/162,3550,4683
tschern/3,4,5,6,7,8,9,10,15,30,31,32,57,71,72,73,74,85,86,94,97,100,101,103,104,135,145,147,148,149,152,1816,3942,3974
tschuncaisma/1,358
turbina/1,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,89,90,91,92,93,111,112
uffizial/1,3,5,65,106,109,110,113,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,127,128,129,130,131,134,407,704,1479
unfl/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,105,516,2513,4172
varia/9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,66,75,89,90,91,92,93,107,111,112,172,185,200,250,266,528,568,629,983,1774,2002,2781,3469,3474,4278
vegetar/299,458
Vegl/1,6,3142
zambregia/1,2,9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,54,84,304
zang/3,5,2845,3266
